Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5708
Controlled insurers and controlling producers; compliance with act; when.

Controlled insurers and controlling producers who are not in compliance with section 44-5704 on January 1, 1993, shall have until March 1, 1993, to come into compliance and shall comply with section 44-5705 beginning with all policies written or renewed on or after March 1, 1993.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 75.